Florida, session 2026, SB1756.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 68 69 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âMedical Freedom 70 Act.â 71 Section 2.âSection 9 of chapter 2023-43, Laws of Florida, 72 as amended by section 1 of chapter 2025-114, Laws of Florida, is 73 repealed. 74 Section 3.âParagraph (d) of subsection (2) of section 75 381.00315, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 76 381.00315âPublic health advisories; public health 77 emergencies; isolation and quarantines.âThe State Health Officer 78 is responsible for declaring public health emergencies, issuing 79 public health advisories, and ordering isolation or quarantines. 80 (2) 81 (d)âThe State Health Officer, upon declaration of a public 82 health emergency, may take actions that are necessary to protect 83 the public health. Such actions include, but are not limited to: 84 1.âDirecting manufacturers of prescription drugs or over 85 the-counter drugs who are permitted under chapter 499 and 86 wholesalers of prescription drugs located in this state who are 87 permitted under chapter 499 to give priority to the shipping of 88 specified drugs to pharmacies and health care providers within 89 geographic areas identified by the State Health Officer. The 90 State Health Officer must identify the drugs to be shipped. 91 Manufacturers and wholesalers located in the state must respond 92 to the State Health Officerâs priority shipping directive before 93 shipping the specified drugs. 94 2.âNotwithstanding chapters 465 and 499 and rules adopted 95 thereunder, directing pharmacists employed by the department to 96 compound bulk prescription drugs and provide these bulk 97 prescription drugs to physicians and nurses of county health 98 departments or any qualified person authorized by the State 99 Health Officer for administration to persons as part of a 100 prophylactic or treatment regimen. 101 3.âNotwithstanding s. 456.036, temporarily reactivating the 102 inactive license of the following health care practitioners, 103 when such practitioners are needed to respond to the public 104 health emergency: physicians licensed under chapter 458 or 105 chapter 459; physician assistants licensed under chapter 458 or 106 chapter 459; licensed practical nurses, registered nurses, and 107 advanced practice registered nurses licensed under part I of 108 chapter 464; respiratory therapists licensed under part V of 109 chapter 468; and emergency medical technicians and paramedics 110 certified under part III of chapter 401. Only those health care 111 practitioners specified in this paragraph who possess an 112 unencumbered inactive license and who request that such license 113 be reactivated are eligible for reactivation. An inactive 114 license that is reactivated under this paragraph shall return to 115 inactive status when the public health emergency ends or before 116 the end of the public health emergency if the State Health 117 Officer determines that the health care practitioner is no 118 longer needed to provide services during the public health 119 emergency. Such licenses may only be reactivated for a period 120 not to exceed 90 days without meeting the requirements of s. 121 456.036 or chapter 401, as applicable. 122 4.âOrdering an individual to be examined, tested, treated, 123 isolated, or quarantined for communicable diseases that have 124 significant morbidity or mortality and present a severe danger 125 to public health. Individuals who are unable or unwilling to be 126 examined, tested, or treated for reasons of health, religion, or 127 conscience may be subjected to isolation or quarantine. For the 128 purposes of this subparagraph, the State Health Officerâ²s 129 authority to treat or order treatment does not include the 130 authority to order a vaccination. 131 a.âExamination, testing, or treatment may be performed by 132 any qualified person authorized by the State Health Officer. 133 b.âIf the individual poses a danger to the public health, 134 the State Health Officer may subject the individual to isolation 135 or quarantine. If there is no practical method to isolate or 136 quarantine the individual, the State Health Officer may use any 137 means necessary to treat the individual. 138 c.âAny order of the State Health Officer given to 139 effectuate this paragraph is immediately enforceable by a law 140 enforcement officer under s. 381.0012. 141 Section 4.âPresent subsection (4) of section 456.054, 142 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (5) and amended, 143 and a new subsection (4) is added to that section, to read: 144 456.054âKickbacks prohibited.â 145 (4)âIt is unlawful for a vaccine manufacturer to offer or 146 pay, a commission, bonus, kickback, or rebate, directly or 147 indirectly, overtly or covertly, in cash or in kind, for the 148 administration of a vaccine. It is unlawful for a health care 149 practitioner to receive such a commission, bonus, kickback, or 150 rebate from a vaccine manufacturer for the administration of a 151 vaccine. 152 (5)(4)âViolations of this section are shall be considered 153 patient brokering and are shall be punishable as provided in s. 154 817.505. 155 Section 5.âSection 456.0575, Florida Statutes, is amended 156 to read: 157 456.0575âDuty to notify patients.â 158 (1)âADVERSE INCIDENTS.âA Every licensed health care 159 practitioner shall inform each patient, or an individual 160 identified pursuant to s. 765.401(1), in person about adverse 161 incidents that result in serious harm to the patient. 162 Notification of outcomes of care that result in harm to the 163 patient under this section does not constitute an acknowledgment 164 of admission of liability, nor can such notifications be 165 introduced as evidence. 166 (2)âVACCINATIONS OF MINORS.â 167 (a)âEach health care practitioner authorized by law to 168 administer vaccines, and each paramedic acting pursuant to s. 169 401.272, shall, before administering one or more vaccines to a 170 minor child, provide the parent or guardian with the following: 171 1.âThe most recently issued Vaccine Information Statement 172 published by the United States Centers for Disease Control and 173 Prevention pertaining to each vaccine being administered. 174 2.âMaterials approved and adopted by joint rule of the 175 Board of Medicine and the Board of Osteopathic Medicine relating 176 to the role of immunizations in communicable disease prevention, 177 including risks, benefits, safety, and efficacy. 178 (b)âBefore administering one or more vaccines to a minor 179 child, the health care practitioner or paramedic must obtain the 180 signature of the parent or guardian acknowledging receipt of the 181 information required under paragraph (a). 182 (c)âWhen more than one vaccine is to be administered, the 183 health care practitioner shall discuss the timing of multiple 184 vaccinations with the childâ²s parent or guardian and the 185 parentâs or guardianâs options for such timing before 186 administering the initial vaccination. At the request of the 187 parent or guardian, a health care practitioner may administer 188 vaccines to the minor child over multiple encounters. 189 (3)âGOOD FAITH ESTIMATE OF CHARGES.âUpon request by a 190 patient, before providing nonemergency medical services in a 191 facility licensed under chapter 395, a health care practitioner 192 shall provide, in writing or by electronic means, a good faith 193 estimate of reasonably anticipated charges to treat the 194 patientâs condition at the facility. The health care 195 practitioner shall provide the estimate to the patient within 7 196 business days after receiving the request and is not required to 197 adjust the estimate for any potential insurance coverage. The 198 health care practitioner shall inform the patient that the 199 patient may contact his or her health insurer or health 200 maintenance organization for additional information concerning 201 cost-sharing responsibilities. The health care practitioner 202 shall provide information to uninsured patients and insured 203 patients for whom the practitioner is not a network provider or 204 preferred provider which discloses the practitionerâs financial 205 assistance policy, including the application process, payment 206 plans, discounts, or other available assistance, and the 207 practitionerâs charity care policy and collection procedures. 208 Such estimate does not preclude the actual charges from 209 exceeding the estimate. Failure to provide the estimate in 210 accordance with this subsection, without good cause, shall 211 result in disciplinary action against the health care 212 practitioner and a daily fine of $500 until the estimate is 213 provided to the patient. The total fine may not exceed $5,000. 214 Section 6.âThe amendments made by this act to s. 215 456.0575(2)(a) and (b), Florida Statutes, relating to 216 information that must be provided to parents or guardians before 217 the administration of a vaccination to a minor are effective 218 July 1, 2026, or 30 days after the Board of Medicine and the 219 Board of Osteopathic Medicine adopt by joint rule the 220 informational materials as required under s. 456.0575(2)(a), 221 Florida Statutes, as created by this act, whichever occurs 222 later. The Board of Medicine and the Board of Osteopathic 223 Medicine shall adopt the joint rule no later than 120 days after 224 this act becomes a law and shall notify the Division of Law 225 Revision immediately upon their adoption of the joint rule. This 226 section takes effect upon becoming a law. 227 Section 7.âSection 458.3351, Florida Statutes, is created 228 to read: 229 458.3351âPrescription or administration of ivermectin.âA 230 health care practitioner who is licensed under this chapter and 231 whose license includes prescribing authority is immune from 232 civil or criminal liability or disciplinary action for 233 prescribing or administering ivermectin to an adult in good 234 faith, in accordance with the applicable standard of care and in 235 accordance with this chapter and the rules pertaining to his or 236 her practice. 237 Section 8.âSection 459.0156, Florida Statutes, is created 238 to read: 239 459.0156âPrescription or administration of ivermectin.âA 240 health care practitioner who is licensed under this chapter and 241 whose license includes prescribing authority is immune from 242 civil or criminal liability or disciplinary action for 243 prescribing or administering ivermectin to an adult in good 244 faith, in accordance with the applicable standard of care and in 245 accordance with this chapter and the rules pertaining to his or 246 her practice. 247 Section 9.âSection 464.0181, Florida Statutes, is created 248 to read: 249 464.0181âPrescription or administration of ivermectin.âA 250 health care practitioner who is licensed under this chapter and 251 whose license includes prescribing authority is immune from 252 civil or criminal liability or disciplinary action for 253 prescribing or administering ivermectin to an adult in good 254 faith, in accordance with the applicable standard of care and in 255 accordance with this chapter and the rules pertaining to his or 256 her practice. 257 Section 10.âSection 465.1897, Florida Statutes, is created 258 to read: 259 465.1897âSale of ivermectin without a prescription.â 260 (1)âA pharmacist may provide ivermectin to a person 18 261 years of age or older without a prescription as a behind-the 262 counter medication until the United States Food and Drug 263 Administration approves it for over-the-counter sale. 264 (2)âBefore providing ivermectin under this section, the 265 pharmacist shall provide the person with written information 266 regarding the indications and contraindications for ivermectin, 267 the appropriate dosage, and the need to seek follow-up care from 268 the personâs primary care physician. 269 (3)âA pharmacist acting in good faith is immune from civil 270 or criminal liability or disciplinary action for providing 271 ivermectin to an adult in accordance with this section. 272 (4)âThe board may adopt rules to implement this section. 273 Section 11.âSubsections (5) and (9) of section 1003.22, 274 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 275 1003.22âSchool-entry health examinations; immunization 276 against communicable diseases; exemptions; duties of Department 277 of Health.â 278 (5)âA child is exempt from immunization requirements in 279 subsection (3) The provisions of this section shall not apply 280 if: 281 (a)âThe parent of the child presents to the school, on a 282 form adopted by rule of the Department of Health and made 283 available on its website, an attestation objects in writing that 284 the administration of immunizing agents conflicts with the 285 parentâs his or her religious tenets or practices or conscience; 286 (b)âA physician licensed under the provisions of chapter 287 458 or chapter 459 certifies in writing, on a form approved and 288 provided by the Department of Health, that the child should be 289 permanently exempt from one or more of the required 290 immunizations immunization for medical reasons stated in 291 writing, based upon valid clinical reasoning or evidence, 292 demonstrating the need for the permanent exemption; 293 (c)âA physician licensed under the provisions of chapter 294 458, chapter 459, or chapter 460 certifies in writing, on a form 295 approved and provided by the Department of Health, that the 296 child has received as many immunizations as are medically 297 indicated at the time and is in the process of completing the 298 other required necessary immunizations; 299 (d)âThe Department of Health determines that, according to 300 recognized standards of medical practice, any required 301 immunization is unnecessary or hazardous; or 302 (e)âAn authorized school official issues a temporary 303 exemption, for up to 30 school days, to allow permit a student 304 who transfers into a new county to attend class until his or her 305 records can be obtained. Children and youths who are 306 experiencing homelessness and children who are known to the 307 department, as defined in s. 39.0016, shall be given a temporary 308 exemption for 30 school days. The public school health nurse or 309 authorized private school official is responsible for follow-up 310 followup of each such student until proper documentation or 311 immunizations are obtained. An exemption for 30 days may be 312 issued for a student who enters a juvenile justice program to 313 allow permit the student to attend class until his or her 314 records can be obtained or until the immunizations can be 315 administered obtained. An authorized juvenile justice official 316 is responsible for follow-up followup of each student who enters 317 a juvenile justice program until proper documentation is 318 obtained or immunizations are administered obtained. 319 320 Upon making the exemption form referenced under paragraph (a) 321 available on its website, the Department of Health shall ensure 322 that when the form is downloaded, such download includes, as a 323 single document, the form and materials approved and adopted by 324 joint rule of the Board of Medicine and the Board of Osteopathic 325 Medicine under s. 456.0575(2)(a) relating to the role of 326 immunizations in communicable disease prevention, including 327 risks, benefits, safety, and efficacy. This requirement shall 328 take effect upon the adoption of the joint rule. The web page 329 containing the download link must also include and prominently 330 display a link or links to the United States Centers for Disease 331 Control and Preventionâs current Vaccine Information Statements. 332 (9)âThe presence of any of the communicable diseases for 333 which immunization is required under subsection (3) by the 334 Department of Health in a Florida public or private school 335 authorizes shall permit the county health department director or 336 administrator or the State Health Officer to declare a 337 communicable disease emergency. The declaration of such 338 emergency must shall mandate that all students attending in 339 attendance in the school who have not been immunized against the 340 diseases specified in subsection (3) or related Department of 341 Health rules are not in compliance with the provisions of this 342 section be identified by the district school board or by the 343 governing authority of the private school,; and the school 344 health and immunization records of such children must shall be 345 made available to the county health department director or 346 administrator. Those Children who are identified as not having 347 been being immunized against the disease for which the emergency 348 has been declared must shall be temporarily excluded from school 349 attendance by the district school board, or the governing 350 authority of the private school, until such time as is specified 351 by the county health department director or administrator 352 declares that the communicable disease emergency has ended. 353 Section 12.âExcept as otherwise expressly provided in this 354 act and except for this section, which shall take effect upon 355 this act becoming a law, this act shall take effect July 1, 356 2026.